California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 program family childcare home education network, and the State Department of Social Services shall allocate funding to contracting agencies for distribution of rates and payments pursuant to this section to family childcare providers participating in subsidized childcare and development programs administered by the State Department of Social Services.

(h) The State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services shall exchange any essential data necessary to issue payments to family childcare providers.

(i) The state may designate another agency or agencies to distribute the funds described in subdivision (e) to family childcare providers. Funds allocated
 pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the review or approval of the Department of General Services.

(j) For purposes of this section, a “family childcare provider” means a provider who participates in a state-funded early care and education program, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10421.

(k) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of childcare contractors and providers to pass on rates and
 one-time, per-child stabilization payments pursuant to this section to their employees in the form of compensation, including, but not limited to, salaries, wages, and direct benefits.

(l) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 108, Sec. 3.   (SB 151)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10277.2.

(a) Funding shall be allocated to the State Department of Social Services from funds in Schedule (3) of Item 5180-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2023 and the Budget Act of 2025 and to the State Department of Education from funds specified in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-194-0001 and Schedule (1) of 6100-196-0001 of the Budget Act of 2023, the Budget Act of 2024, and the Budget Act of 2025 to provide a once-per-month, per-child served who is enrolled in a subsidized childcare program cost of care plus rate.

(b) (1) Of the funding described in subdivision (a), the Legislature hereby allocates funds to the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Education to provide centers with the monthly cost of care plus rate
 commencing January 1, 2024, and to June 30, 2025, inclusive. The amount per child shall range between one hundred forty dollars ($140) and two hundred eleven dollars ($211), per month, to be determined based on the region in which the center is located pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3). The state shall provide the amount of the monthly cost of care plus rate for all centers serving children described in this paragraph based on the number of subsidized children enrolled. This monthly rate shall be issued to centers based on monthly child enrollments for subsidized childcare and development and state preschool programs.

(2) Per-child rate amounts shall be as follows:

(A) For centers in the central region, one hundred forty dollars ($140).

(B) For centers in the northern region, one hundred forty-one dollars ($141).

(C) For centers in the southern region, one hundred sixty dollars ($160).

(D) For centers in the Los Angeles region, one hundred seventy-one dollars ($171).

(E) For centers in the bay area region, two hundred eleven dollars ($211).

(3) Regions are defined as follows:

(A) The central region includes the Counties of Fresno, Inyo, Kern, Kings, Madera, Mariposa, Merced, Monterey, Sacramento, San Benito, San Joaquin, San Luis Obispo, Stanislaus, and Tulare.

(B) The northern region includes the
 Counties of Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Glenn, Humboldt, Lake, Lassen, Mendocino, Modoc, Mono, Nevada, Placer, Plumas, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Tuolumne, Yolo, and Yuba.

(C) The southern region includes the Counties of Imperial, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, Santa Barbara, and Ventura.

(D) The Los Angeles region includes the County of Los Angeles only.

(E) The bay area region includes the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Napa, San Francisco, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Solano, and Sonoma.

(c) (1) Funding shall be allocated to the State Department of Social Services from funds in Schedule (3) of Item 5180-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025
 and to the State Department of Education from funds specified in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-194-0001 and Schedule (1) of 6100-196-0001 of the Budget Act of 2023, the Budget Act of 2024, and the Budget Act of 2025 to provide a once-per-month, per-child-served who is enrolled in subsidized childcare cost of care plus rate.

(2) Of the funding described in paragraph (1), the Legislature hereby allocates funds to the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Education to provide centers with the monthly cost of care plus rate commencing July 1, 2025, and to June 30, 2026, inclusive. Commencing July 1, 2026, the monthly cost of care plus rates shall continue. The amount per child shall be equal to the amounts described in subdivision (b) increased by the percentage calculated in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 10277.1. The state shall provide the amount of the monthly cost of care plus rate for all centers serving children described in this paragraph based on the number of subsidized children enrolled. This monthly rate shall be issued to centers based on monthly child enrollments for subsidized childcare and development and state preschool programs.

(3) (A) The amount per child described in paragraph (2) shall be the monthly cost of care rate. The amount per child shall range between one hundred fifty-two dollars ($152) and two hundred thirty dollars ($230) per month to be determined based on the region in which the center is located pursuant to this paragraph. The state shall provide the amount of the monthly cost of care plus rate for all centers serving children described in this paragraph based on the number of subsidized children enrolled. This monthly rate shall be issued to centers based on monthly child enrollments for subsidized childcare and development and state preschool programs. Per-child rate amounts shall be as follows:

(i) For centers in the central region, one hundred fifty-two dollars
 ($152).

(ii) For centers in the northern region, one hundred fifty-four dollars ($154).

(iii) For centers in the southern region, one hundred seventy-four dollars ($174).

(iv) For centers in the Los Angeles region, one hundred eighty-six dollars ($186).

(v) For centers in the bay area region, two hundred thirty dollars
 ($230).

(B) The regions described in this paragraph are the same as those defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(4) If this subdivision is in conflict with a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature.

(d) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Education shall provide centers with a one-time, per-child stabilization payment in the amount of four hundred thirty-one dollars ($431) in the 2025–26 fiscal year. The four-hundred-thirty-one-dollar ($431) per-child payment shall be provided to all centers who provided subsidized childcare and development or state preschool program services in the month of April 2025, based on enrollment numbers for that month.

(e) The monthly and one-time, per-child stabilization payments described in this section shall be payable to centers operating or serving programs pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225) of, migrant childcare and development programs pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235) of, a general childcare and development program pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240) of, a family childcare home education network pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250) of, childcare and development services for children with special needs pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260) of, or the CalWORKs Stage 1, Stage 2, or Stage 3 program pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of, Part 1.8 of Division 9 of this code, or the Emergency Child Care Bridge Program for Foster Children pursuant to Chapter 2
 (commencing with Section 11461.6) of Part 2 of this code, or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(f) In addition to the monthly rates and one-time, per-child stabilization payments described in this section, the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services shall provide contractors, or any other agency designated to distribute payments to these centers, with a 10-percent administrative fee for processing the monthly rates and a 5-percent administrative fee for processing the one-time, per-child stabilization payments. For payments provided after June 30, 2025, the 10-percent administrative fee for processing the monthly rates shall only apply to the monthly rate amounts specified in subdivision (b).

(g) The State Department of Education shall allocate funding for distribution of payments to state preschool program contractors, and the State Department of Social Services shall allocate funding for distribution of payments to contractors participating in State Department of Social Services subsidized childcare and development programs.

(h) The State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services shall exchange any essential data necessary to issue payments to
 centers.

(i) The state may designate another agency or agencies to distribute the funds described in subdivision(d) to centers. Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual and shall not be subject to the review or approval of the Department of General Services.

(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of childcare contractors and providers to pass on rates and flat-rate one-time, per-child stabilization payments pursuant to this section to their employees in the form of compensation, including, but not limited to, salaries, wages, and direct benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 108, Sec. 4.   (SB 151)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10277.3.

(a) (1) To support family childcare providers, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10421, and encourage their participation in training, forty million dollars ($40,000,000) was previously appropriated for the establishment of the Joint Child Care Providers United - State of California Training Partnership Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 264 of Chapter 116 of the Statutes of 2021.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2025, and upon full ratification of the memorandum of understanding between the Child Care Providers United - California and the State of California, entered into on August 7, 2025, and for each year of the agreement until July 1, 2028, funding shall be allocated to the State Department of Social Services in Schedule (3) of Item 5180 of the annual Budget Act, upon approval by the Department of Finance, to make a single contribution of up to fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to the fund described in paragraph (1) within 90 days of receipt of an annual report of the fund’s expenditures to restore the fund’s balance to fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) if the remaining balance of the annual report is less than that amount, in accordance with the memorandum of understanding between the State of California and the Child Care Providers United - California entered into on August 7, 2025. Reports may be submitted no later than June 30 of each year, until July 1, 2028.

(3) Thirty days prior to making the additional contribution specified in paragraph (2), the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Finance shall provide a notice to the Senate Health and Human Services budget subcommittees, Assembly and Senate Education budget subcommittees, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office of the intended amount of the additional contribution for purposes of implementing paragraph (2).

(b) If the provisions of this section
 are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 108, Sec. 5.   (SB 151)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10277.4.

(a) (1) One hundred million one hundred thousand dollars ($100,100,000) was previously appropriated for the establishment and administration of the Child Care Providers United - California (CCPU) Workers Health Care Fund pursuant to Schedule 3 of Item 5180-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 for the purpose of providing health care benefits to currently active family childcare providers, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10421.

(2) In accordance with the memorandum of understanding between CCPU and the State of California, entered into on August
 7, 2025, CCPU shall provide the state with an annual report detailing the distribution of funds from the prior year and any remaining balance. Reports may be submitted no later than June 30 of each year until July 1, 2028.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2025, and for each year until July 1, 2028, funding shall be allocated to the State Department of Social Services in Schedule (3) of Item 5180 of the annual Budget Act, upon approval by the Department of Finance, to make a single contribution of additional funding to the fund within 90 days of receiving the annual report described in paragraph (2), to restore funding based on provider enrollment in accordance with the memorandum of understanding between the State of California and CCPU entered into on August 7, 2025.

(4) Thirty days prior to making the additional contribution specified in paragraph (3), the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Finance shall provide a notice to the Senate Health and Human Services budget subcommittees, Assembly and Senate Education budget subcommittees, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office of the intended amount of the additional contribution for purposes of implementing paragraph (3).

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions
 of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 108, Sec. 6.   (SB 151)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10277.5.

(a) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) was previously appropriated from the General Fund to the State Department of Social Services in the 2023−24 fiscal year for a one-time contribution payable to Child Care Provider United – California (CCPU), or its designee, for the establishment of the CCPU Retirement Trust.

(b) Eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) was previously appropriated from the General Fund to the State Department of Social Services in the 2023−24 fiscal year for a lump-sum contribution to the trust established pursuant to subdivision (a) for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to family childcare providers, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10421. An appropriation to the trust established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not require the state to assume any administrative or fiduciary responsibilities related to the trust, which shall be the sole responsibilities of CCPU and its designated trust administrator.

(c) In accordance with the memorandum of understanding between CCPU and the State of California, entered into on August 7, 2025, CCPU shall provide the state with an annual report detailing the distribution of funds from the prior year and any remaining balance. Reports may be submitted no later than June 30 of each year until July 1, 2028.

(d) (1) Beginning July 1, 2025, and once for each year until July 1, 2028, funding shall be allocated to the State Department of Social Services in Schedule (3) of Item 5180 of the annual Budget Act, upon approval by the Department of Finance, to make a single contribution of additional funding to the trust established pursuant to subdivision (a) to restore the balance to eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) within 90 days of receiving the annual report described in subdivision (c) if the remaining balance reported in the report is less than eighty million dollars ($80,000,000), in accordance with the memorandum of understanding between the State of California and CCPU entered into on August 7, 2025.

(2) Thirty days prior to making the additional contribution specified in paragraph (1), the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Finance shall provide a notice to the Senate Health and Human Services budget subcommittees, Assembly and Senate Education budget subcommittees, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office of the intended amount of the additional contribution for purposes of implementing paragraph (1).

(e) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant
 to Section 10426, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 108, Sec. 7.   (SB 151)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10277.6.

(a) Funding shall be allocated from funds appropriated to the State Department of Social Services in Schedule (3) of Item 5180-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2026, if consistent with that item, to provide a once-per-month, per-child-served cost of care plus rate for providers serving children enrolled in the following subsidized childcare programs:

(1) Alternative payment programs, including migrant alternative payment programs (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225)).

(2) Migrant childcare and development programs (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235)).

(3) General childcare and development programs
 (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240)).

(4) Family childcare home education networks (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250)).

(5) Childcare and development services for children with special needs (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260)).

(6) CalWORKs Stage 1, Stage 2, or Stage 3 programs (Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370)).

(7) Emergency Child Care Bridge Program for Foster Children (Section 11461.6).

(b) (1) Of the funding described in subdivision (a), funding is hereby allocated to the State Department of Social Services to provide childcare providers with a monthly cost of care plus rate increase commencing July 1, 2026. The increase per child
 shall be equal to the amount calculated in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2).

(2) The Department of Finance shall make the following calculations based on data provided by the State Department of Social Services:

(A) The total cost of providing the statutory cost-of-living adjustment for childcare programs in the 2026–27 fiscal year pursuant to Section 42238.15 of the Education Code for the subsidized childcare programs described in subdivision (a).

(B) The estimated cost of providing the monthly cost of care plus rates described in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 10277.1 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 10277.2 in the 2026–27 fiscal year based on the estimates of child enrollment in 2026–27 provided by the State Department of Social Services.

(C) Divide the amount calculated in subparagraph (A) by the amount calculated in subparagraph (B).

(D) Notwithstanding any other law, the cost-of-living adjustment for the 2026–27 fiscal year shall be 2.009 percent for the purpose of the calculation in this paragraph.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 30.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Reimbursement Rates [10280. - 10287.5.]

10280.

(a) The department, in collaboration with the State Department of Education, shall implement a reimbursement system plan that establishes reasonable standards and assigned reimbursement rates, which vary with the length of the program year and the hours of service.

(1) Parent fees shall be used to pay reasonable and necessary costs for providing additional services.

(2) When establishing standards and assigned reimbursement rates, the department and the State Department of Education shall confer with applicant agencies.

(3) The reimbursement system, including standards and rates, shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget
 Committee.

(4) The department may establish any regulations deemed advisable concerning conditions of service and hours of enrollment for children in the programs.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2021, the standard reimbursement rate shall be twelve thousand eight hundred eighty-eight dollars ($12,888) and, commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, shall be increased by the cost-of-living adjustment granted by the Legislature annually pursuant to Section 42238.15 of the Education Code.

(c) (1) Commencing January 1, 2022, contractors who, as of December 31, 2021, received the standard reimbursement rate established in this section shall be reimbursed at the greater of the following:

(A) The 75th percentile of the 2018 regional market rate
 survey.

(B) The contract per-child reimbursement amount as of December 31, 2021.

(2) (A) Commencing July 1, 2022, subject to available funding, the department may issue temporary rate increases to contractors that exceed the rates specified in paragraph (1). The department shall have discretion in determining how funding may be used to increase the rates, including, but not limited to, providing one-time lump-sum payments. The department may contract with another entity to distribute this funding to contractors.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this subparagraph shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Public
 Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual and shall not be subject to review or approval of the Department of General Services.

(3) In accordance with federal requirements for Child Care Stabilization Grants appropriated pursuant to the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2), contractors shall provide information via a one-time application or survey in advance of receiving American Rescue Plan Act funds. The department shall specify the timeline and format in which this information shall be submitted and information shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Address, including ZIP Code.

(B) Race and ethnicity.

(C) Gender.

(D) Whether the provider is open and available to provide childcare services or closed due to the COVID-19 public health emergency.

(E) What types of federal relief funds have been received from the state.

(F) Use of federal relief funds received.

(G) Documentation that the provider met certifications as required by federal law.

(4) Rate increases shall be subject to federal usage limitations and federal and state program eligibility requirements.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), for the 2023–24, 2024–25, and 2025–26 fiscal years, the cost-of-living adjustments required pursuant to subdivision (b) shall instead be zero. It is the intent of the Legislature that any adjustment in the 2023–24 and 2024–25 fiscal years related to reimbursement for programs funded pursuant to this section will be subject to a ratified agreement, and subject to future legislation providing for appropriations related to the budget bill.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, childcare and
 development programs shall not receive a cost-of-living adjustment in the 2026–27 fiscal year except for childcare resource and referral programs (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10217)) and local childcare and development planning councils (Chapter 31 (commencing with Section 10480)), which shall receive a 2.009-percent cost-of-living adjustment.

(f) Commencing July 1, 2025, and through June 30, 2026, if a program is open and operating in accordance with its approved program calendar and remains open and providing services to certified children throughout the program year, the contract reimbursement shall be based on the lesser of the following:

(1) The maximum reimbursable amount stated in the contract.

(2) Net reimbursable program costs.

(g) Commencing July 1, 2026, contract reimbursement shall be based on the lesser of the following:

(1) The maximum reimbursable amount stated in the contract.

(2) Net reimbursable program costs.

(3) The product of the adjusted child days of enrollment for certified children times the contract rate set forth in this section.

(h) Commencing July 1, 2025, and through June 30, 2026, reimbursement for family childcare home education network providers funded through migrant childcare and development programs pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235), general childcare and development programs pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240), or childcare and development services for children with special needs pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260) shall receive 100 percent of reimbursement based on the family’s certified need for services at the maximum authorized hours of care less any allowable administrative expenses withheld by the contractor.

(i) If subdivision(h) is in conflict with a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 31.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10280.2.

(a) (1) Consistent with the agreement, dated June 25, 2021, entered into by the Governor and Child Care Providers United - California, the state and Child Care Providers United - California shall establish a Joint Labor Management Committee to develop recommendations for a single reimbursement rate structure that addresses quality standards for equity and accessibility while supporting positive learning and developmental outcomes for children. The State Department of Social Services shall secure a contractor, in consultation with the Joint Labor Management Committee, to assist with the work to be completed pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) The Joint Labor Management Committee shall develop the recommendations
 described in paragraph (1) and shall present the recommendations to the Department of Finance no later than November 15, 2022, to inform the Governor’s proposed budget for the 2023–24 fiscal year, which will be presented to the Legislature by January 10, 2023.

(3) To aid in these efforts related to rate reform and quality investments, the department may allocate up to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) of the funds described in subdivision (d) of Provision 5 of Item 6100-149-0890 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Ch. 32, Stats. 2021), as amended by Senate Bill 129 of the 2021–22 Regular Session, for the purposes of this subdivision. Within 30 days of securing a contractor, the department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee on the scope of work, and, within 60 days after the end of the contract period, shall provide the Joint Legislative Budget Committee with a report of all actual expenditures incurred.

(4) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services. 

(b) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall, in consultation with the State Department of Education, convene a working group separate from the Joint Labor Management Committee established pursuant to subdivision (a) to assess the methodology for establishing reimbursement rates and the existing quality standards for child care and development and preschool programs, including, but not limited to,
 licensing standards and the requirements in Subchapter 12 (commencing with Section 18270) of Chapter 19 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, as that subchapter read on June 30, 2021, for equity and accessibility to all provider types and settings. This assessment shall be informed by evidence-based elements that best support child development and positive child outcomes. The workgroup shall include, but not be limited to, Child Care Providers United - California to represent family child care providers, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10421, teacher and administrator representatives of state-funded center-based contractors for both preschool and infant-toddler settings, child development experts, parent representatives, a Head Start representative, an alternative payment program agency representative, and representatives from the administration, as determined necessary by the department.

(2) The assessment and any recommendations of the workgroup shall be research-based, account for the diversity of California’s child care and development and early learning system, account for alignment across federal Head Start and state-subsidized programs, and be aligned with the experience and education of the child care workforce, as well as the environmental settings of child care and development programs. The workgroup shall, no later than August 15, 2022, provide recommendations, including, but not limited to, recommendations on how the State Department of Social Services should define child care workforce competencies and how these competencies would align with rate reform, to the Joint Labor Management Committee established pursuant to subdivision (a), the Department of Finance, and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10281.

(a) (1) For purposes of this section, “early childhood mental health consultation service” means a service benefiting an infant or toddler who is 0 to 36 months of age, inclusive, and is served in a general childcare and development program pursuant to this chapter, or a child who is 0 to 5 years of age, inclusive, and is served in a family childcare home education network setting funded by a general childcare and development program pursuant to this chapter.

(2) For purposes of this section, “early childhood mental health consultation service” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Support for providers, parents, legal guardians, and caregivers to create
 proactive trauma-informed, inclusive environments and to respond effectively to all children.

(B) Assistance through individual site consultations, provision of resources, formulation of training plans, referrals, and other methods that address the unique needs of programs and providers.

(C) Aid to providers, parents, legal guardians, and caregivers, and encouragement and facilitation of collaboration and communication, in developing the skills and tools needed to be successful as they support the development and early learning of all children, including observing environments, facilitating the development of action plans, and supporting site implementation of those plans.

(D) The development of strategies for addressing prevalent child mental health concerns, including internalizing problems, such as appearing
 withdrawn, and externalizing problems, such as exhibiting persistent and serious behaviors.

(E) If a child exhibits persistent and serious behaviors, support with the pursuit and documentation of reasonable steps to maintain the child’s safe participation in the program, as described in Section 10491.1.

(F) Face-to-face interactions or video-based platforms and other modes of communication that are compliant with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (Public Law 104-191), such as the telephone.

(G) Group or individual consultations of any of the actions described in this paragraph.

(b) The cost to a provider agency of providing an early childhood mental health consultation service shall be reimbursable pursuant to Section
 10281.5 if all of the following apply:

(1) The early childhood mental health consultation service is provided on a schedule of sufficient and consistent frequency, continuously throughout the program year, to significantly contribute to all of the following:

(A) Improving interpersonal relationships and child outcomes.

(B) Increasing the confidence, competence, and well-being of those consulted.

(C) Eliminating suspensions and expulsions.

(2) (A) The early childhood mental health consultation service is provided by one of the following persons:

(i) A licensed mental health professional, including a
 marriage and family therapist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed professional clinical counselor, a licensed psychologist, a licensed child and adolescent psychiatrist, a credentialed school counselor, or a school psychologist credentialed pursuant to Section 44266, and employed pursuant to Section 49400, of the Education Code. The person described in this subparagraph shall have at least three years of experience providing mental health services to children zero to five years of age, inclusive, shall have training in infant, family, and early childhood mental health, shall be adequately insured, shall have held their respective license for a minimum of two years, and shall be in full compliance with all continuing education requirements applicable to their profession.

(ii) A license-eligible marriage and family therapist, a license-eligible clinical social worker, a license-eligible professional clinical counselor, a
 license-eligible psychologist, or a license-eligible child and adolescent psychiatrist, who is supervised by a person meeting all of the requirements described in clause (i).

(iii) A person holding, at a minimum, a master’s degree in a field related to mental health or human services, including, but not limited to, marriage and family therapy, clinical social work, professional clinical counseling, infant mental health, human development, human services, psychology, school psychology, child and adolescent psychiatry or occupational therapy, education, social work, and other related fields, as determined by the department, and who has at least two years of experience working with children zero to five years of age, inclusive, who is supervised by a person meeting all of the requirements described in clause (i).

(iv) A person meeting all of the requirements described in clause (i)
 who is providing supervision pursuant to clause (ii) may be an employee of a contracting agency, including on a temporary or part-time basis, or engaged as an external contractor, provided that supervision takes place on a regular basis that is sufficient to offer professional guidance and support.

(B) Any person providing mental health consultation services pursuant to this section shall have a successful criminal background check.

(3) The early childhood mental health consultation service uses a relationship-based model emphasizing strengthening relationships among early childhood education providers, parents, children, and representatives of community systems and resources, and integrates reflective practice into the onsite consultation model. This model shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) At least twice per program year, conducting early care- and education setting-based mental health assessments, such as the “Climate of Healthy Interactions for Learning & Development (CHILD)” or other appropriate instrument.

(B) Recordkeeping that adequately documents all consultation activities.

(C) With consent from parents or legal guardians, at least one screening of each enrolled child for adverse childhood experiences and screening for buffering factors, including, but not limited to, resilience.

(4) Within the first 30 days upon hire or start of consultation service, a provider agency ensures that a consultant is trained in all of the following:

(A) California law and professional ethics for early childhood mental health
 consultation, including all of the following:

(i) Contemporary professional ethics and statutory, regulatory, and decisional laws that delineate the scope of practice of early childhood mental health consultation.

(ii) The therapeutic, clinical, and practical considerations involved in the legal and ethical practice of early childhood mental health consultation.

(iii) Confidentiality, particularly as it pertains to minors.

(B) Child abuse and neglect mandated reporting laws.

(C) Best practices and foundations of early childhood mental health consultation.

(D) All relevant laws and regulations regarding state and federal
 childcare programs.

(5) Consultants and supervisors shall participate in continuing professional development and education for at least 18 hours per program year. Topics may include, but are not limited to, infant-family and early childhood mental health, implicit bias and equity, trauma-informed practice, early childhood development, and consultation.
